Hawaii statutes.
§428-809 Grounds for administrative
termination. The director may commence a proceeding to terminate a limited
liability company administratively if the company fails to:

(1) Pay any fees prescribed by law;

(2) File its annual report for a period of two years
pursuant to section 428-210;

(3) Appoint and maintain an agent for service of
process as required by this part; or

(4) File a statement of a change in the name or
business address of the agent as required by this part. [L 1996, c 92, pt of
§1; am L 2001, c 129, §97]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next